Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.620

Drug control assistance unit—Additional duties—Information system on violations—Inter-unit communications network.

The drug control assistance unit shall:

(1) Establish a record system to coordinate with all law enforcement agencies in the state a comprehensive system of information concerning violations of the narcotic and drug laws.

(2) Provide a communications network capable of interconnecting all offices and investigators of the unit.

[ 1970 ex.s. c 63 s 3.]